Illinois, session 104th, HB2770.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 11-8 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/11-8)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on July 1, 2029)8    Sec. 11-8. Vote centers.9    (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, election 10authorities shall establish at least one location to be 11located at an office of the election authority or in the 12largest municipality within its jurisdiction where all voters 13in its jurisdiction are allowed to vote on election day during 14polling place hours, regardless of the precinct in which they 15are registered, and that location shall provide curbside 16voting. Election authorities may establish more than one vote 17center, but in jurisdictions with a population of more than 18500,000 inhabitants, the election authority shall establish at 19least 2 vote centers. An election authority establishing such 20a location under this Section shall identify the location and 21any health and safety requirements by the 40th day preceding 22an election and certify such to the State Board of Elections.23    (b) (Blank). This Section is repealed on July 1, 2029.  HB2770- 2 -LRB104 10575 SPS 20651 b1    (c) In addition to the vote centers established under 2subsection (a), election authorities may establish additional 3vote centers under the model described in subsection (d). If 4an election authority establishes additional vote centers 5under this Section, the appointment of election judges shall 6follow the procedures described in Articles 13 and 14, but the 7requirements for the number of election judges shall apply to 8each vote center, rather than each election precinct. 9Otherwise, vote centers have the same authority and 10responsibilities as election precincts and shall follow the 11same procedures set forth in this Code.12    (d) If an election authority establishes additional vote 13centers as described under subsection (c), the election 14authority shall do so in accordance with the following:15        (1) For each general primary election and general 16    election, an election authority shall designate a minimum 17    number of vote centers, as follows:18            (A) For counties with at 250,000 registered 19        voters:20                (i) during the period from the 15th day before 21            the day of election to the 5th day before the day 22            of election, at least one vote center for each 23            75,000 registered voters;24                (ii) during the period from the 4th day before 25            the day of election to the day before the day of 26            election, at least one vote center for each 20,000   HB2770- 3 -LRB104 10575 SPS 20651 b1            registered voters; and2                (iii) on the day of election, at least one 3            vote center for each 12,500 registered voters.4            (B) For counties with at least 37,500 registered 5        voters but fewer than 250,000 registered voters:6                (i) during the period from the 15th day before 7            the day of election to the 5th day before the day 8            of election, at least one vote center for each 9            75,000 registered voters, except that there must 10            be at least one vote center in each county;11                (ii) during the period from the 5th day before 12            the day of election to the day before the day of 13            election, at least one vote center for each 20,000 14            registered voters; and15                (iii) on the day of election, at least one 16            vote center for each 12,500 registered voters.17            (C) For counties with at least 12,500 registered 18        voters but fewer than 37,500 registered voters:19                (i) during the period from the 15th day before 20            the day of election to the day before the day of 21            election, at least one vote center; and22                (ii) on the day of election, at least 3 vote 23            centers.24            (D) For counties with fewer than 12,500 registered 25        voters, from the 15th day before the day of election 26        through day of election, at least one vote center.  HB2770- 4 -LRB104 10575 SPS 20651 b1        For the purposes of this paragraph, the number of 2    registered in a county is the number of voters registered 3    in the county on the date of the preceding presidential 4    election or on the date of the preceding general election, 5    whichever is greater.6        (2) Election authorities shall follow the guidelines 7    for locations and hours of early voting as set forth in 8    Article 19A. An election jurisdiction shall not have fewer 9    permanent early voting locations than required under 10    Article 19A.11        (3) An election authority may designate a greater 12    number of vote centers than the minimum required by this 13    Section.14        (4) In selecting the location for vote centers 15    required under paragraph (1), each election authority 16    shall consider:17            (A) proximity to public transportation lines and 18        availability of parking;19            (B) geographic features that affect access and 20        convenience;21            (C) equitable distribution across the county so as 22        to afford maximally convenient options for voters;23            (D) the existence and location of population 24        centers;25            (E) access for persons with disabilities;26            (F) use of existing voting locations that   HB2770- 5 -LRB104 10575 SPS 20651 b1        typically serve a significant number of voters;2            (G) use of public buildings that are known to 3        voters in the county, especially to the extent that 4        using the buildings results in cost savings compared 5        to other potential locations;6            (H) when private locations are designated as vote 7        centers, methods and standards to ensure the security 8        of voting conducted at the locations;9            (I) proximity to historically under-represented 10        communities;11            (J) if a proposed location was used in a previous 12        election, the number of electors that used the 13        location in the previous election and the recorded 14        wait times at the location, or the number of electors 15        and recorded wait times at nearby locations; and16            (K) the need to locate vote centers in population 17        centers that had lower voter turnout in previous 18        elections. 19(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; 102-668, eff. 11-15-21; 20102-1109, eff. 12-21-22; 103-467, eff. 8-4-23.)